Illinois, session 104th, SB2491.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Efficient Building Act is amended by 5changing Section 55 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3125/55)7    Sec. 55. Illinois Stretch Energy Code.8    (a) The Board, in consultation with the Agency, shall 9create and adopt the Illinois Stretch Energy Code, to allow 10municipalities and projects authorized or funded by the Board 11to achieve more energy efficiency in buildings than the 12Illinois Energy Conservation Code through a consistent pathway 13across the State. The Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall be 14available for adoption by any municipality and shall set 15minimum energy efficiency requirements, taking the place of 16the Illinois Energy Conservation Code within any municipality 17that adopts the Illinois Stretch Energy Code.18    (b) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall have separate 19components for commercial and residential buildings, which may 20be adopted by the municipality jointly or separately.21    (c) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall apply to all 22projects to which an energy conservation code is applicable 23that are authorized or funded in any part by the Board after   SB2491- 2 -LRB104 12220 HLH 22325 b1July 1, 2024.2    (d) Development of the Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall 3be completed and available for adoption by municipalities by 4June 30, 2024.5    (e) Consistent with the requirements under paragraph (2.5) 6of subsection (g) of Section 8-103B of the Public Utilities 7Act and under paragraph (2) of subsection (j) of Section 8-104 8of the Public Utilities Act, municipalities may adopt the 9Illinois Stretch Energy Code and may use utility programs to 10support compliance with the Illinois Stretch Energy Code. The 11amount of savings from such utility efforts that may be 12counted toward achievement of their annual savings goals shall 13be based on reasonable estimates of the increase in savings 14resulting from the utility efforts, relative to reasonable 15approximations of what would have occurred absent the utility 16involvement.17    (f) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code's residential 18components shall:19        (1) apply to residential buildings as defined under 20    Section 10;21        (2) set performance targets using a site energy index 22    with reductions relative to the 2006 International Energy 23    Conservation Code; and24        (3) include stretch energy codes with site energy 25    index standards and adoption dates as follows: by no later 26    than June 30, 2024, the Board shall create and adopt a   SB2491- 3 -LRB104 12220 HLH 22325 b1    stretch energy code with a site energy index no greater 2    than 0.50 of the 2006 International Energy Conservation 3    Code; by no later than December 31, 2026 2025, the Board 4    shall create and adopt a stretch energy code with a site 5    energy index no greater than 0.40 of the 2006 6    International Energy Conservation Code, unless the Board 7    identifies unanticipated burdens associated with the 8    stretch energy code adopted in 2023 or 2024, in which case 9    the Board may adopt a stretch energy code with a site 10    energy index no greater than 0.42 of the 2006 11    International Energy Conservation Code, provided that the 12    more relaxed standard has a site energy index that is at 13    least 0.05 more restrictive than the 2024 International 14    Energy Conservation Code; by no later than December 31, 15    2029 2028, the Board shall create and adopt a stretch 16    energy code with a site energy index no greater than 0.33 17    of the 2006 International Energy Conservation Code, unless 18    the Board identifies unanticipated burdens associated with 19    the stretch energy code adopted in 2025, in which case the 20    Board may adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy 21    index no greater than 0.35 of the 2006 International 22    Energy Conservation Code, but only if that more relaxed 23    standard has a site energy index that is at least 0.05 more 24    restrictive than the 2027 International Energy 25    Conservation Code; and by no later than December 31, 2032 26    2031, the Board shall create and adopt a stretch energy   SB2491- 4 -LRB104 12220 HLH 22325 b1    code with a site energy index no greater than 0.25 of the 2    2006 International Energy Conservation Code.3    (g) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code's commercial 4components shall:5        (1) apply to commercial buildings as defined under 6    Section 10;7        (2) set performance targets using a site energy index 8    with reductions relative to the 2006 International Energy 9    Conservation Code; and10        (3) include stretch energy codes with site energy 11    index standards and adoption dates as follows: by no later 12    than June 30, 2024, the Board shall create and adopt a 13    stretch energy code with a site energy index no greater 14    than 0.60 of the 2006 International Energy Conservation 15    Code; by no later than December 31, 2025, the Board shall 16    create and adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy 17    index no greater than 0.50 of the 2006 International 18    Energy Conservation Code; by no later than December 31, 19    2028, the Board shall create and adopt a stretch energy 20    code with a site energy index no greater than 0.44 of the 21    2006 International Energy Conservation Code; and by no 22    later than December 31, 2031, the Board shall create and 23    adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy index no 24    greater than 0.39 of the 2006 International Energy 25    Conservation Code.26    (h) The process for the creation of the Illinois Stretch   SB2491- 5 -LRB104 12220 HLH 22325 b1Energy Code includes:2        (1) within 60 days after the effective date of this 3    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Capital 4    Development Board shall meet with the Illinois Energy Code 5    Advisory Council to advise and provide technical 6    assistance and recommendations to the Capital Development 7    Board for the Illinois Stretch Energy Code, which shall:8            (A) advise the Capital Development Board on 9        creation of interim performance targets, code 10        requirements, and an implementation plan for the 11        Illinois Stretch Energy Code;12            (B) recommend amendments to proposed rules issued 13        by the Capital Development Board;14            (C) recommend complementary programs or policies;15            (D) complete recommendations and development for 16        the Illinois Stretch Energy Code elements and 17        requirements by December 31, 2023;18        (2) As part of its deliberations, the Illinois Energy 19    Code Advisory Council shall actively solicit input from 20    other energy code stakeholders and interested parties.21(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-4, eff. 5-31-23.)